Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-411. Methods of voting absentee.

(a)

Absentee voting may be accomplished in one (1) of the following methods and in no other manner:

(1)(A)

By delivery of the ballot by mail that must be received in the office of the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter not later than 7:30 p.m. on election day.

(B)(i)

However, except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) of this section, by ballots applied for not later than thirty (30) days before the election by qualified electors outside the United States on election day that are signed, dated, postmarked, and mailed by the voters no later than the day of the election and received by the county clerk no later than 5:00 p.m. ten (10) calendar days after the date of the election.

(ii)

The absentee ballots of armed services personnel serving in active status shall be counted if received by the county clerk no later than 5:00 p.m. ten (10) calendar days after the date of the election and if the absentee ballots were executed no later than the date of the election.

(C)

Each absentee ballot shall be mailed separately by the voter and shall not be included with any other absentee ballot in a bulk mailing, except that an administrator of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the State of Arkansas or hospital may mail the absentee ballots of the residents and patients by bulk mail. Absentee ballots in any bulk mailing not otherwise permitted in this subsection shall not be counted;

(2)

By delivery of the ballot to the county clerk of the county of residence of the voter not later than 7:30 p.m. on election day by the designated bearer, administrator, or the authorized agent of the absentee voter who is medically unable to vote at the regular polling site, upon proper verification of the signature of the voter by the county clerk and validation of the identity of the authorized agent; or

(3)

The voter may deliver the ballot to the county clerk of the county of his or her residence not later than the close of regular business hours on the day before the election.

(b)

Any person to whom an absentee ballot is delivered according to the precinct voter registration list but who elects to vote by early voting or to vote at his or her polling site on election day shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 10; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 1; 1981, No. 685, § 2; 1983, No. 430, § 5; 1985, No. 567, § 4; 1985, No. 568, § 4; 1985, No. 612, § 2; 1985, No. 1024, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-910; Acts 1987, No. 843, § 4; 1989, No. 912, § 9; 1997, No. 1092, § 7; 1999, No. 491, § 1; 1999, No. 1538, § 4; 1999, No. 1586, § 1; 2001, No. 1257, § 1; 2001, No. 1767, § 1; 2003, No. 273, § 1; 2003, No. 1275, § 4; 2005, No. 2193, § 4; 2007, No. 543, § 5; 2007, No. 556, § 8; 2009, No. 250, §§ 11, 12.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 543 deleted the (a)(2)(A) designation; deleted “upon proper verification of the signature of the voter by the county clerk and validation of the identity of the authorized agent” following “site” in (a)(2); deleted former (a)(2)(B); deleted former (b); and redesignated former (c) as present (b).

The 2007 amendment by No. 556 substituted “delivery of the ballot” for “ballot cast” in (a)(1)(A); substituted “by a qualified elector” for “by qualified electors” in (a)(1)(B)(i); substituted “The absentee ballot” for “Absentee ballots” in (a)(1)(B)(ii); substituted “residential care facility licensed by the State of Arkansas” for “residential facility” in (a)(1)(C); and substituted “to whom an absentee ballot is delivered” for “who receives an absentee ballot” in (c).

The 2009 amendment substituted “armed” for “uniformed” in (a)(1)(B)(ii); and substituted “administrator” for “administrative head” in (a)(1)(C).

7-5-412. Marking and return of absentee ballots — Delivery of mailed absentee ballots.

(a)

Upon receiving the blank absentee ballot, voter statement, and envelopes, whether in the office of the county clerk or elsewhere, the voter shall mark the absentee ballot and place the absentee ballot in the provided envelope. He or she shall then seal the envelope containing the absentee ballot and place it in the other provided outer envelope with the following:

(1)

The completed and executed voter statement, including identification of the designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator when appropriate; and

(2)(A)

Verification of voter registration; or

(B)

A copy of a current and valid photographic identification or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the first-time voter, for first-time voters who registered by mail. However, this requirement does not apply if:

(i)

The voter registered to vote by mail and provided the identification at that time; or

(ii)

The first-time voter registered to vote by mail and submitted his or her driver's license number or at least the last four (4) digits of his or her Social Security number at the time and this information matches the information in an existing state identification record bearing the same number, name, and date of birth as provided in the registration.

(b)(1)

A voter who desires to cast an absentee ballot but who does not meet the identification requirements of subdivision (a)(2) of this section may cast his or her absentee ballot by mail, and the absentee ballot shall be considered as a provisional ballot.

(2)(A)

The voter statement accompanying the absentee ballot shall include a sworn statement portion that may be completed by the voter stating that the voter is registered to vote and that he or she is the person who is registered.

(B)

The sworn statement portion of the voter statement is not required to be notarized, but the voter shall execute the sworn statement under penalty of perjury.

(c)

After recording receipt of the absentee ballot in the electronic voter registration system, absentee ballots received by mail on election day before the polls close shall be delivered promptly by the county clerk to the election officials designated to canvass and count absentee ballots.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 11; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-911; Acts 1997, No. 1092, § 8; 2003, No. 647, § 2; 2003, No. 994, § 11; 2005, No. 880, § 5; 2007, No. 556, § 9; 2009, No. 250, § 13; 2013, No. 1424, § 9; 2017, No. 633, § 12.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, subsection (a) of this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2003, No. 994. Subsection (a) of this section was also amended by Acts 2003, No. 647 to read as follows:

“(a)

Upon receiving the blank ballot, statement, and envelopes, whether in the office of the county clerk or elsewhere, the voter shall mark the ballot, tear off the lower ballot stub end, and place the ballot in the provided envelope. He or she shall place the ballot, the executed statement, and the ballot stub in the provided envelope.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “his or her ballot” for “a ballot” in present (b); and deleted “Ballots by mail shall be counted if received no later than the time the polls close on election day” at the beginning of (c).

The 2009 amendment inserted “absentee” preceding “ballot” in seven places; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment inserted “voter” preceding “statement” in (a); in (a)(1), inserted “completed and” and “including identification of the designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator when appropriate”; and substituted “After recording receipt of the absentee ballot in the electronic voter registration system, absentee” for “Absentee” in (c).

The 2017 amendment added present (a)(2)(A); redesignated former (a)(2) as present (a)(2)(B); redesignated former (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B) as present (a)(2)(B)(i) and (a)(2)(B)(ii); redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); and added (b)(2).

7-5-413. Voting machines — Related duties.

(a)(1)

At least one (1) voting machine equipped for use by individuals with disabilities shall be placed in the county clerk's designated location for early voting for the election in accordance with this subchapter and at any off-site polling locations established by the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

Those persons entitled under the law to vote early by personal appearance shall cast their votes on voting systems under the laws applicable to early voting, and the clerk or election official shall enter the name of each voter on a list at the time he or she votes.

(b)

After regular business hours, the clerk at the clerk's designated early voting location or the election official at any off-site polling place shall secure the machines against further voting at the close of each day's voting in the presence of authorized poll watchers, if any. When early voting is concluded, the clerk or the election official shall secure the machines against further voting.

(c)(1)

At the time designated in the notice of election, a set of election officials for the machines used for early voting shall canvass the vote in the manner provided for regular polling sites. After the canvass has been made, the machines shall be secured and shall remain inaccessible to voting.

(2)

The results of the canvass shall be returned to the county board of election commissioners to be tabulated and canvassed with and in the same manner as the returns of other election precincts.

(d)

Any candidate or political party may be present in person or by a representative designated in writing during the progress of early voting and at the canvass of the results in any election for the purpose of determining whether or not the votes in any election are fairly and accurately cast and counted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 16; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 1; 1985, No. 567, § 6; 1985, No. 568, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-916; Acts 1995, No. 686, § 6; 1995, No. 948, § 6; 1997, No. 1092, § 9; 2005, No. 2233, § 8; 2007, No. 556, § 10; 2007, No. 1020, § 12.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2007, Nos. 556 and 1020 both amended (c)(1). The Arkansas Code Revision Commission implemented the amendment by Acts 2007, No. 1020 since there was an irreconcilable conflict between the two acts.

Acts 2007, No. 556, § 10 provided:

“(c)(1) At the time designated by law for the closing of the polls on election day or at the time designated for counting absentee and early voting ballots in the notice provided for in the public notice of election, a set of election officials for the machines used for early voting shall canvass the vote in the manner provided for regular polling sites. After the canvass has been made, the machines shall be secured and shall remain inaccessible to voting.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 556 inserted “or at the time designated for counting absentee and early voting ballots in the notice provided for in the public notice of election” in (c)(1).

7-5-414. Appointment of election clerks — Qualifications.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall appoint election clerks to process, count, and canvass the absentee voters' ballots in all elections.

(b)(1)

The election clerks who are to canvass the absentee ballots shall be appointed in the same manner and at the same time the poll workers are selected to serve at the regular voting precincts.

(2)

The election clerks shall possess the same qualifications as the poll workers who serve at the regular voting precincts.

(c)

The processing, counting, and canvassing of the absentee ballots shall be under the supervision and at the direction of the county board of election commissioners.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-912; Acts 1997, No. 1092, § 10; 2005, No. 1827, § 5; 2007, No. 556, § 11; 2009, No. 959, § 18.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added the (b)(1) and (b)(2) designations; and deleted “and have the same powers and duties” following “qualifications” in (b)(2).

The 2009 amendment substituted “election clerks” for “election officials” in three places; substituted “poll workers” for “election officials” in two places; inserted “process” in (a) and made related changes; and added (c).

7-5-415. Compensation of county clerk for extra deputy.

The county clerk's budget shall be paid not less than minimum wage for a period not to exceed thirty-five (35) days for hiring one (1) extra deputy for the purpose of carrying out the requirements of this act. The fee for this one (1) extra deputy shall be established and paid by the county, city, or other political subdivision, the representatives of which call the election, or in the case of a state-funded election, by the State Board of Election Commissioners. Any additional deputies beyond the one (1) extra deputy may be hired as necessary to carry out the purposes of early voting and absentee voting, if approved and paid by the quorum court of the county. In the regular general election, the fee for the one (1) extra deputy or additional deputies shall be paid by the county.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-915; Acts 1991, No. 482, § 1; 1997, No. 1092, § 11; 2007, No. 556, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “thirty-five (35) days” for “twenty (20) days” and substituted “state-funded election” for “primary.”

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1969, No. 465, codified as §§7-1-101,7-1-103 —7-1-105,7-3-101 —7-3-108,7-4-101 —7-4-105,7-4-107 —7-4-112,7-5-101,7-5-102,
7-5-103 [repealed],7-5-202 —7-5-209,7-5-210 [repealed],7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-303 [repealed],7-5-304 —7-5-306,7-5-307 [repealed],7-5-308,7-5-309,7-5-312,7-5-313 [repealed],7-5-314 —7-5-319,7-5-401 —7-5-403,7-5-405 —7-5-417,7-5-501 [repealed],7-5-502 —7-5-504,7-5-505 [repealed],7-5-506 [repealed],7-5-507,7-5-508 [repealed],7-5-509,7-5-511 [repealed],7-5-512,7-5-513,7-5-514 [repealed],7-5-515 —7-5-518,7-5-519 [repealed],7-5-520 —7-5-522,7-5-524 —7-5-531,7-5-701 —7-5-706,7-5-801 —7-5-809,7-6-101 —7-6-105,7-7-101 —7-7-105,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-307,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-401,7-7-402,7-7-403 [repealed],7-8-101 —7-8-104,7-8-301,7-8-302,7-8-304 —7-8-307,25-16-801.

7-5-416. Counting of absentee ballots.

(a)(1)

The election officials for absentee ballots may meet in a place designated by the county board of election commissioners no earlier than the Tuesday before the election for the purpose of opening the outer envelope, processing, and canvassing of absentee ballot paper work and no earlier than 8:30 a.m. on election day for the purpose of opening the inner absentee ballot envelope and counting the absentee ballots.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall give public notice of the time and location of the opening, processing, canvassing, and counting of absentee ballots and early voting ballots as provided in §7-5-202.

(3)

The county clerk shall forward the following items to the election officials designated by the county board of election commissioners to open, process, canvass, and count absentee ballots:

(A)

The absentee ballot applications sorted alphabetically or by precinct;

(B)

The absentee ballots; and

(C)

A written report containing the following information:

(i)

The number of absentee ballot applications received by the county clerk;

(ii)

The number of absentee ballots sent by the county clerk;

(iii)

The number of absentee ballots returned to the county clerk;

(iv)

The number of absentee ballots rejected by the county clerk and the reason for the rejection;

(v)

The number of absentee ballots marked as received on the paper absentee ballot applications list; and

(vi)

If the number of absentee ballots returned to the county clerk and the number of absentee ballots marked as received on the paper absentee ballot lists are different and the reason for the difference is known, the reason for the difference.

(4)

The processing and counting of absentee ballots shall be open to the public, and candidates and authorized poll watchers may be present in person or by a representative designated in writing under §7-5-312 during the opening, processing, canvassing, and counting of the absentee ballots as provided in this subchapter.

(5)(A)

Absentee and early votes shall be counted prior to the closing of the polls on election day as provided under this section.

(B)(i)

The county board of election commissioners shall report by precinct the initial count of early votes and absentee ballot votes to the Secretary of State as provided under §7-5-701 as soon as practical after the polls close on election day.

(ii)

No election results of the precinct shall be printed, posted, or released until after the polls close on election day.

(b)(1)

The opening, processing, counting, and canvassing of absentee ballots shall be conducted as follows:

(A)

One (1) of the election officials shall open outer absentee ballot envelopes one by one and verify the contents;

(B)

If the required materials are properly placed in the outer absentee ballot envelope, the election official shall proceed to read aloud from the voter statement the name of the voter;

(C)

If the required materials are not properly placed in the outer absentee ballot envelope, a second election official shall open the inner absentee ballot envelope to verify the contents;

(D)

If all required materials are present within one (1) or the other envelope, the election officials shall put the materials in the proper envelope while preserving the secrecy of the voter's ballot and shall proceed to read aloud from the voter statement the name of the voter and the voting precinct in which the voter claims to be a legal voter;

(E)

As each outer envelope is opened and the name of the voter is read, the election officials for the absentee box shall list the name and voting precinct of the voter;

(F)(i)

After the election official reads aloud from the statement, the election officials shall compare the name, address, date of birth, and signature of the voter's absentee application with the voter's statement and, for first-time voters who registered by mail, the first-time voter's identification document unless the voter previously provided identification at the time of mailing the voter registration application.

(ii)

If the county board of election commissioners determines that the application and the voter's statement do not compare as to name, address, date of birth, and signature, the absentee ballot shall not be counted.

(iii)

If a first-time voter fails to provide the required identification with the absentee ballot or at the time of mailing the voter registration application, then the absentee application, absentee ballot envelope, and voter's statement shall be placed in an envelope marked “provisional” and the absentee ballot shall be considered a provisional ballot;

(G)

The election officials shall compare the name and address of the bearer, agent, or administrator written on the absentee ballot return envelope with the information on the voter statement. If the information does not match, then the outer envelope, absentee application, secrecy envelope containing the ballot, and the voter's statement shall be placed in an envelope marked “provisional” and the absentee ballot shall be considered a provisional ballot;

(H)

If the absentee voter fails to return the voter statement, the vote shall not be counted;

(I)

Failure of the voter to submit the required absentee materials in the proper envelopes shall not be grounds for disqualifying the voter;

(J)

If the voter statement does not authorize a bearer, agent, or administrator to receive or return his or her absentee ballot and the ballot was received or returned by a bearer, agent, or administrator, the vote shall not be counted;

(K)

If no challenge is made by a qualified poll watcher, the election official shall remove the inner envelope, without opening the inner envelope containing the ballot, and place it in the ballot box without marking it in any way;

(L)(i)

After all of the outer envelopes have been opened, the election officials of the absentee box shall preserve all the statements of voters and the voters' identification documents and deliver them to the county clerk, who shall file and keep them for the same length of time after the election as is required for retention of other ballots.

(ii)

The voter statements shall be made available for public inspection during regular business hours.

(iii)

The voters' identification documents shall not be subject to public inspection except as part of a judicial proceeding to contest the election;

(M)

When all of the inner envelopes containing the ballots have been placed in the ballot box, the ballot box shall be shaken thoroughly to mix the ballots; and

(N)

The ballot box shall be opened and the ballots canvassed and counted.

(2)

No election results shall be printed or released prior to the closing of the polls on election day.

(c)

If any person casting an absentee ballot dies before the polls open on election day, his or her vote shall be accepted by the county clerk if the absentee ballot is:

(1)

Signed, dated, postmarked, and mailed before the date of death;

(2)

Signed, dated, and delivered to the county clerk by a designated bearer, authorized agent, or administrator before the date of death; or

(3)

The ballot of a member of the armed services or Arkansas National Guard in active duty or state active duty executed before the date of death.

(d)

It is the intent of this section to require the election officials for absentee ballots to meet and process, canvass, and count absentee ballots according to this section prior to the closing of the polls on election day.

(e)(1)

Absentee votes shall be cast on paper ballots.

(2)(A)

The ballots shall first be counted for write-in votes by the election officials.

(B)

Then, at the discretion of the county board of election commissioners, the ballots may be either hand counted or counted on an electronic vote tabulating device.

(f)(1)

Absentee ballots marked as “special runoff ballots” received from a qualified voter from one (1) of the categories in §7-5-406(a) shall be opened for general primary elections and general runoff elections according to the procedures described in subsection (b) of this section.

(2)

However, in counting the special runoff ballot, one (1) of the election officials shall open the envelope containing the special runoff ballot and read the numbers indicated next to the names of the two (2) candidates in the general primary election or in the general runoff election.

(3)

The candidate with the highest ranking shall receive the vote.

(4)

A special runoff ballot received with the preferential primary absentee ballot shall be counted in the general primary election, and a special runoff ballot received with the general election absentee ballot shall be counted in the general runoff election.

(5)

The Secretary of State shall prepare instructions for opening, counting, and canvassing special runoff ballots and provide the instructions to each county board of election commissioners.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 13; 1971, No. 261, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-913; Acts 1989, No. 505, § 1; 1993, No. 845, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 1092, § 12; 1999, No. 1368, § 1; 2003, No. 647, §§ 3, 4; 2003, No. 994, § 12; 2003, No. 1154, § 3; 2003, No. 1744, § 1; 2005, No. 138, § 2; 2005, No. 751, § 2; 2005, No. 880, § 6; 2007, No. 261, § 2; 2007, No. 556, § 13; 2009, No. 250, § 14; 2009, No. 959, §§ 19, 20; 2013, No. 466, § 1; 2013, No. 1211, §§ 3, 4; 2013, No. 1424, § 10; 2017, No. 790, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 462, § 9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2003, Nos. 994, 1154, and 1744. Subdivision (b)(1)(B) and subsection (d) of this section were also amended by Acts 2003, No. 647 to read as follows:

“(b)(1)(B)

As each envelope is opened and the name of the voter is read, the election officials for the absentee box shall list in duplicate the name and voting precinct of the voter and shall write on the stub end of the ballot taken from the envelope the number of the voter taken from this list of voters;

“(d)

It is the intent of this section to permit the election officials for absentee ballots to meet and open the outer envelope and make a list in duplicate of the name and voting precinct of each voter casting an absentee ballot, to write on the stub end of the ballot the number of the voter taken from the list of voters, and to deposit the envelope containing the ballot in the ballot box and to deposit the ballot stub ends in another ballot box prior to the closing of the polls on election day.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250 inserted “absentee” preceding “ballot” twice in (b)(1)(F)(iii).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 deleted “and the voting precinct in which the voter claims to be a legal voter” at the end of (b)(1)(B); and inserted “the county board of election commissioners determines that” in (b)(1)(F)(ii).

The 2013 amendment by No. 466 rewrote (c).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1211, in (a)(5)(A), substituted “and” for “or”, “shall” for “may”, and inserted “as provided under this section”; inserted (a)(5)(B); and substituted “require” for “permit” in (d).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1424, in (a)(1), deleted “in the courthouse” following “shall meet” and inserted “no earlier than 8:30 a.m.”; in (a)(3), substituted “On election day, the” for “The” and inserted “following items to the election officials designated by the county board to open, process, canvass, and count absentee ballots”; redesignated part of (a)(3) as (a)(3)(A) and inserted (a)(3)(B) and (a)(3)(C); deleted “to the election officials for absentee ballots” at the end of (a)(3)(A); in (a)(4), inserted “processing and” and substituted “authorized poll watchers” for “political parties” and “under” for “pursuant to”; redesignated former (a)(5) as present (a)(5)(A) and inserted (a)(5)(B); added “on election day” in (b)(2); deleted “and who is temporarily residing outside the territorial limits of the United States” following “§7-5-406(a)” in (f)(1); and inserted (b)(1)(G) and (b)(1)(J) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “may meet” for “shall meet”, inserted “the Tuesday before the election for the purpose of opening the outer envelope, processing, and canvassing of absentee ballot paper work and no earlier than”, and substituted “opening the inner absentee ballot envelope and counting the absentee ballots” for “processing absentee ballots”; deleted “On election day” from the beginning of (a)(3); in (a)(5)(B)(i), deleted “No later than thirty (30) minutes after the polls close on election day” preceding “The county” at the beginning, and added “as soon as practical after the polls close on election day”; deleted “in duplicate” following “shall list” in (b)(1)(E); and deleted “and a list has been made in duplicate of the name and voting precinct of the voters as required in this section” following “opened” in (b)(L)(i).

The 2019 amendment, in (c)(3), inserted “or Arkansas National Guard” and “or state active duty”.

7-5-417. Challenge of absentee votes.

(a)

When the name and voting precinct of a voter is read by the election official, any candidate or qualified poll watcher pursuant to §7-5-312 may challenge the vote in the manner provided by law for personal voting challenges, and the election officials shall consider the ballot as a provisional ballot.

(b)

If the statement is not in proper form or for any other legal reason the vote should not be counted, the ballot shall not be counted and shall be preserved together with the statement and envelope for the same period of time that the statements are preserved.

(c)

If the county board of election commissioners determines that the provisional voter is qualified and that the vote was properly cast, the vote shall be counted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 9, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-914; Acts 1997, No. 1092, § 13; 2003, No. 1154, § 4; 2005, No. 67, § 13; 2005, No. 880, § 7; 2007, No. 556, § 14.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 261 inserted “and is temporarily residing outside the territorial limits of the United States” in (f)(1).

7-5-418. Early voting.

(a)(1)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, early voting shall be available to any qualified elector who applies to the county clerk's designated early voting location, beginning fifteen (15) days before a preferential primary or general election between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 6:00 p.m. Monday through Friday and 10:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m. Saturday and ending at 5:00 p.m. on the Monday before the election.

(B)

Early voting shall not be available on state or county holidays.

(2)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section, on all other elections, including the general primary and general runoff elections, early voting shall be available to any qualified elector who applies to the county clerk during regular office hours, beginning seven (7) days before the election and ending on the day before the election day at the time the county clerk's office regularly closes.

(B)

If an annual school election is held at the same time as the preferential primary election or general election, early voting for the annual school election shall comply with subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section.

(b)(1)(A)

The county board of election commissioners may decide to hold early voting at additional polling sites outside the offices of the county clerk on any of the days and times provided for in subsection (a) of this section, if it so chooses.

(B)

The county board of election commissioners shall determine by unanimous vote the location of additional polling sites for early voting.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall appoint the election officials for the additional early voting polling site or sites in the same manner as election officials are appointed for election day.

(3)(A)

The county board of election commissioners shall notify the county clerk of its decision to hold early voting at additional polling sites outside the office of the county clerk within ten (10) days of the decision.

(B)

If the county board of election commissioners decides to hold early voting at one (1) or more conveniently located polling sites on the days and times under subsection (a) of this section, the county clerk may choose not to hold early voting within the office of the county clerk. The county clerk shall notify the county board of election commissioners within ten (10) days of the receipt of notice from the county board of election commissioners regarding early voting at additional polling sites.

(4)

The early voting election official shall record the date on all pages of the early voting roster or early voting request form and keep a daily record of the number of early ballots cast.

(5)

All voted ballots and unvoted ballots and all related election materials at each additional early voting polling site shall be stored in a secure location in the county courthouse or in a secure location as determined by the county board of election commissioners immediately after the close of the additional polling sites each day that early voting is conducted there.

(c)

Before a person is permitted to cast an early vote, the county clerk or election official shall:

(1)

Request the voter to identify himself or herself by stating his or her name, date of birth, and address in order to verify his or her registration;

(2)

Request that the voter verify his or her registration by providing a document or identification card that meets the requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, if required by that section;

(3)

If the voter's name or address is not the same as that in the county voter registration record files, request the voter to complete an updated voter registration application form;

(4)

Request the voter to sign an early voting roster or early voting request form that identifies his or her name, address, date of birth, and the date on the roster or form; and

(5)

Enter the voter's precinct number on the early voting roster or early voting request form.

(d)(1)

If the voter is not listed in the county voter registration record files and the county clerk is unable to verify the voter's registration and if the voter contends that he or she is eligible to vote, then the voter may vote a provisional ballot that shall be counted only upon verification of the voter's registration status.

(2)(A)

If the voter fails to present verification of voter registration, the election official shall follow the procedure in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13.

(B)(i)

A person who is a resident of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state is not required to provide verification of voter registration before voting.

(ii)

A person not required to provide verification of voter registration under subdivision (d)(2)(B)(i) of this section shall provide documentation from the administrator of the facility attesting that the person is a resident of the facility.

(e)

The county clerk or county board of election commissioners shall furnish voting locations that adequately allow the early voter to personally and secretly execute his or her ballot.

(f)

Except as provided in this section, early voting shall be conducted in the same manner as voting on election day. Conduct that is prohibited or restricted on election day shall be subject to the same prohibitions and restrictions on the days on which early voting is conducted.

(g)(1)

The county clerk shall electronically record in the permanent voter registration record of an elector who voted at an early voting location to indicate that the elector has voted.

(2)

Except as provided under subdivision (g)(3) of this section, the county clerk shall electronically record in the permanent voter registration record no later than twenty-four (24) hours after the elector has voted.

(3)

If the elector votes on a Friday or Saturday, the county clerk shall electronically record in the permanent voter registration record no later than the close of business on the Monday following the vote.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 686, § 7; 1995, No. 948, § 7; 1997, No. 967, § 1; 1997, No. 1092, § 14; 2003, No. 269, § 1; 2005, No. 655, § 1; 2005, No. 880, § 8; 2005, No. 1690, § 1; 2007, No. 556, § 15; 2007, No. 987, § 1; 2009, No. 375, § 3; 2009, No. 959, § 21; 2013, No. 595, § 6; 2013, No. 979, § 1; 2013, No. 1059, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 6; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 6; 2017, No. 633, § 13; 2017, No. 910, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2013, No. 1059. Acts 2013, No. 979 added a new subsection to read as follows:

“(g)(1)

The county clerk shall electronically record in the permanent voter registration record of an elector who voted at an early voting location to indicate that the elector has voted.

“(2)

Except as provided under subdivision (g)(3) of this section, the county clerk shall electronically record in the permanent voter registration record no later than twenty-four (24) hours after the elector has voted.

“(3)

If the elector votes on a Friday or Saturday, the county clerk shall electronically record in the permanent voter registration record no later than the close of business on the Monday following the vote.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 556 inserted “or county” in (a)(1)(B); in (a)(1)(B)(2), substituted “presidential preferential primary” for “but not limited to,” “seven (7)” for “fifteen (15)” and “the election” for “an election,” and made minor punctuation changes; deleted “and to include the additional voting locations for a maximum of fifteen (15) days” following “clerk” in (b)(1)(A); deleted former (b)(1)(C); rewrote (b)(2); substituted “the county board shall hold early voting” for “early voting shall be held” in (b)(3)(B)(ii); deleted former (b)(5) and redesignated former (b)(6) as present (b)(5); in (c)(1), inserted “or herself” and inserted “or her” twice; inserted “or her” in (c)(3); and deleted former (g) and redesignated former (h) as present (g).

The 2007 amendment by No. 987 inserted “presidential preferential primary” and made related changes in (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment by No. 375 deleted ”presidential preferential primary” preceding “general primary,” and made related changes in (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 deleted (b)(3)(B)(ii); substituted “at one (1) or more conveniently located polling sites on the days and times under subsection (a) of this section” for “at additional polling sites outside the office of the county clerk” in (b)(3)(B); deleted (f); and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly.

The 2013 amendment by No. 595 inserted (c)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; redesignated former (d) as (d)(1); and added (d)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1059 added (g).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 14 and 15 added (a)(2)(B); and added “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section” to the beginning of (a)(2)(A).

The 2017 amendment by No. 633 rewrote (c)(2); in (d)(2)(A), substituted “to present verification of voter registration” for “to provide proof of identity”
and substituted “Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13” for “§7-5-321” at the end; and substituted “verification of voter registration” for “proof of identity” in (d)(2)(B)(i) and (d)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2017 amendment by No. 910 inserted “preferential primary election or” in (a)(2)(B).

7-5-419. [Transferred.]

Publisher's Notes.

Former §
7-5-419 has been renumbered by Acts 2009, No. 959, §
22 as §
7-5-403.